Delaware, session 153, HB44.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Part 1, Title 14 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Chapter 48. Migrant Education Program. Â§ 4801. Purposes. The purposes of this chapter are: (1) To support high-quality and comprehensive educational programs and services during the school year and, as applicable, during summer or intersession periods, that address the unique educational needs of migratory children. (2) To ensure that migratory children receive full and appropriate opportunities to meet the same challenging State academic standards that all children are expected to meet. (3) To help migratory children overcome educational disruption, cultural and language barriers, social isolation, various health-related problems, and other factors that inhibit the ability of such children to succeed in school. (4) To help migratory children benefit from State and local systemic reforms. Â§ 4802. Funding. The Department must ensure that migratory childrenâs educational needs are met. If federal funding is insufficient to meet the needs of migratory education, the Department shall identify, transfer, or request the appropriation of supplemental funding from the State or other sources so as to ensure no interruption in services under this chapter. Â§ 4803. Services. The services provided under this program must include all services that were provided by this State on January 19, 2025, or that were required to be provided in accordance with the Elementary and Secondary Education Act (ESEA), 20 U.S.C. Â§ 6301 et seq. as of January 19, 2025. Â§ 4804. Regulations. (a) The Department may promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this chapter.